New Jersey, session 222, S637.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any rule or regulation adopted by the department to the contrary, an owner or operator of a sanitary landfill facility that is authorized to accept solid waste for final disposal on the effective date of this section or that is closed with or without the approval of the department on or after the effective date of this section, shall: (1) obtain a permit pursuant to P.L.1954, c.212 (C.26:2C-1 et seq.); (2) install and operate a landfill gas collection and control system, which conforms to any applicable rules and regulations adopted by the department, and, if installed or modified on or after the effective date of this section, meets the standards of subsection b. of this section; (3) conduct quarterly surface monitoring of the facility's surface for methane levels, using procedures prescribed by the department pursuant to subsection c. of this section; (4) ensure that methane emissions from the facility do not exceed 500 parts per million by volume at any single location at the facility, or 25 parts per million by volume on average over the entire area of the facility; (5) submit to the department each year an estimate of the amount of methane generated by the facility each year; and (6) keep records and make reports to the department as necessary to comply with the requirements of this section. b.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any rule or regulation adopted by the department to the contrary, a landfill gas collection and control system installed, or modified as described in subsection c. of this section, on or after the effective date of this section shall conform to the following minimum standards: (1) the system shall route all collected gas to a gas control device, and shall be operated continuously; (2) the system shall be designed and operated so as to minimize the migration of subsurface gases; (3) the system shall be capable of temporary operation without venting gases to the atmosphere in the event that the flare or other outlet for the gases is inoperative; (4) the gas extraction components of the system shall be constructed of polyvinyl chloride, high density polyethylene, fiberglass, stainless steel, or other nonporous corrosion resistant material of suitable dimensions to convey the projected amounts of gases, and of suitable strength to withstand installation, static, and settlement forces; and (5) any flare or energy recovery device used as an outlet for the system shall achieve a methane destruction efficiency of at least 99 percent in addition to conforming with the requirements of the facility's permit issued pursuant to P.L.1954, c.212 (C.26:2C-1 et seq.). c.  If an owner or operator of a sanitary landfill facility covered under this section undertakes a modification of the facility's landfill gas collection and control system, such that the system requires the owner or operator to obtain a new or amended air pollution permit issued pursuant to P.L.1954, c.212 (C.26:2C-1 et seq.), the department shall require, as a condition of the permit or permit renewal, that the landfill gas collection and control system, at minimum, meets the standards of subsection b. of this section. d.  The department shall adopt, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), such rules and regulations as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act.  The rules and regulations shall include procedures for owners and operators of sanitary landfill facilities to monitor the surface-level methane emissions at the facility, in order to facilitate compliance with the provisions of subsection a. of this section. e.  A violation of the provisions of this section or any rule and regulation adopted pursuant thereto shall be considered a violation of P.L.1970, c.39 (C.13:1E-1 et seq.) and shall be subject to the same penalties and enforcement measures provided in section 9 of P.L.1970, c.39 (C.13:1E-9). f.     Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of the department to impose more stringent or additional requirements on the owners or operators of sanitary landfill facilities pursuant to any other State or federal law. 2.  This act shall take effect 24 months after the date of enactment, but the Department of Environmental Protection may take such anticipatory action in advance of that date as may be necessary for the timely implementation of this act upon its effective date, including the adoption of rules and regulations.